Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 6
COLORADO WAR VETERANS' MEMORIAL COMMISSION

28-5-601 to 28-5-603. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part repealed, p. 1628, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 6 was numbered as article 9 of chapter 144, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 6 prior to its repeal in 1979, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.